Utah statutes.
26-1-22.   Budget preparation and submission to governor.

The department shall prepare and submit to the governor a proposed budget to be included in the budget submitted by the governor to the legislature for the fiscal year following the convening of the legislature.



Enacted by Chapter 126, 1981 General Session

